Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.350

Interest arbitration panel proceeding—Consent to change existing wages, hours, and conditions of employment.

During the pendency of the proceedings before the arbitration panel, existing wages, hours, and other conditions of employment shall not be changed by action of either party without the consent of the other but a party may so consent without prejudice to his rights or position under RCW 41.80.310 through 41.80.370.

[ 2019 c 234 s 8.]